apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="/bie__vblex" c="Class Irregular"> 
      <e><p><l>bie</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bie</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bie</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biem</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bini</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bien</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rashë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ramë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ratë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ranë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bija</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bije</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>binte</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>binim</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>binit</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>binin</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bihem</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bihe</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bihet</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bihemi</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biheti</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bihen</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rashë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ramë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ratë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ranë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bihesha</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biheshe</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bihej</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biheshim</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biheshit</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biheshin</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bie</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biesh</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bjerë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biem</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bini</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bien</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rënça</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënç</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënstë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënçim</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënçi</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënçin</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rënkam</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënke</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënka</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkbiei</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkeni</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkan</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rënkësha</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkëshe</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkësh</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkëshim</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkëshit</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënkëshin</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bjer</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bini</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>rënë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënë</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënët</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënët</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënët</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënët</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rënët</l><r>bie<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bie"><i></i><par n="/bie__vblex"/></e>
